Arkansas, session 2025, HB1400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-37-302(a), concerning the payment
required to redeem a tax-delinquent parcel, is amended to read as follows:
(a) To redeem a tax-delinquent parcel with the county collector or the
Commissioner of State Lands or to purchase a tax-delinquent parcel at the
Commissioner of State Lands' sale, the redeemer or purchaser of the tax-
delinquent parcel shall pay all delinquent taxes, plus:
(1) Ten percent (10%) simple interest for each year of
delinquency;
(2) A Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a
ten percent (10%) penalty for each year of the delinquency; and
(3) The costs incurred by the county and the Commissioner of
State Lands.

*JLL134*
02-20-2025 10:56:25 JLL134

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 HB1400
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-37-302, concerning the payment required
to redeem a tax-delinquent parcel, is amended to add an additional subsection
to read as follows:
(e)(1) As used in this section, "disabled veteran" means a person
described in § 26-3-306(a)(1)(A)(i).
(2) A disabled veteran is not subject to the penalty imposed
under subdivision (a)(2) of this section when redeeming a tax-delinquent
parcel owned by the disabled veteran from the Commissioner of State Lands if
the disabled veteran:
(A) Submits a letter that meets the requirements stated in
§ 26-3-306(b)(1)(A) to the Commissioner of State Lands; and
(B) Meets all other requirements to redeem the tax-
delinquent parcel under § 26-37-310.

/s/Richmond





















02-20-2025 10:56:25 JLL134